Utah statutes.
61-2e-303.   Recordkeeping.

(1)  An appraisal management company required to be registered under this chapter shall maintain a detailed record of the following for the same time period an appraiser is required to maintain an appraisal record for the same real estate appraisal activity:

(a)  a real estate appraisal activity request that the appraisal management company receives; and

(b)  the appraiser that performs the real estate appraisal activity described in Subsection (1) for the appraisal management company.

(2)  As part of the registration process under Part 2, Registration, an appraisal management company shall biennially provide an explanation of its recordkeeping described in Subsection (1) in the form prescribed by the division.

